Maine, session 132, LD168.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4017 is enacted to read:
§4017. Silent electronic notification system
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in Title 25, section 3701,
subsection 1.
B. "Silent electronic notification system" means a silent security system that when
manually activated generates a notification that is intended to signal a life-threatening
or emergency situation requiring a response from a law enforcement agency.
2. Silent electronic notification system; requirements. A public elementary school
or public secondary school that enrolls 12 or more students shall equip each classroom with
a silent electronic notification system. The silent electronic notification system must
automatically notify the E-9-1-1 system, school security personnel and local law
enforcement agencies when manually activated. The silent electronic notification system
must automatically notify parents of students who subscribe to be notified.
3. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.